West Virginia, session 2025, HB3382.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: article 2a. central reception center and emergency resource homes. §49-2A-1. Purpose. The Legislature finds that it is necessary to eliminate the placement of children in the foster system in hotels rooms due to lack of suitable foster care placements. In order to remedy this, a Central Reception Center will be established and the network of Emergency Resource Homes will be used to provide immediate and temporary shelter, comprehensive assessments, and behavioral stabilization services for youths awaiting permanent placement. §49-2A-2. Definitions. (a) "Central Reception Center (CRC)" means a dedicated facility providing short-term, temporary supervision, assessment, and support services to children awaiting placement.(b) "Emergency Resource Homes (ERH)" means foster homes designated to provide emergency overnight care to children who do not yet have permanent placements.(c) "Behavioral Stabilization Services" means crisis intervention, de-escalation, and clinical support for children experiencing mental or behavioral health crises. §49-2A-3. Central Reception Center establishment. (a) The West Virginia Department of Human Services shall establish at least one Central Reception Center to serve as a temporary holding facility for children awaiting foster placement. (b) The Central Reception Center shall operate 24 hours per day and be open every day of the year and provide:(1) Supervised care and temporary shelter for children who have been disrupted from placements.(2) Comprehensive assessment and behavioral stabilization services.(3) Case coordination with child welfare professionals to identify appropriate foster placements.(4) Educational continuity and medical or therapeutic support as needed. (c) The Central Reception Center shall not be classified as a shelter but instead operate as a transitional assessment facility. (d) Any child staying at the Central Reception Center shall not remain more than 48 hours but will be placed in an Emergency Resource Home or other suitable foster home by the end of each 48 hour period. §49-2A-4. Emergency Resource Home recruitment and expansion. (a) The Department of Human Services shall expand the recruitment and licensing of Emergency Resource Homes (ERH) to ensure an adequate number of emergency foster placements across the state. (b) Emergency Resource Home parents shall be:(1) Provided with specialized training in trauma-informed care and crisis intervention;(2) Offered financial incentives to ensure homes remain open and available; and(3) Supported by 24/7 crisis response teams for immediate intervention if needed. (c) The Department of Human Services shall actively recruit Emergency Resource Homes in high-need areas and prioritize homes for adolescents, justice-involved youth, and children with special needs. §49-2A-5. Funding and implementation. (a) Funding for the Central Reception Center and Emergency Resource Homes expansion shall come from:(1) State appropriations.(2) Federal child welfare grants; and(3) Private partnerships and community collaborations. (b) The Department of Human Services shall submit an annual report to the Legislature detailing:(1) The number of children served;(2) Placement success rates;(3) The effectiveness of behavioral stabilization interventions; and(4) The progress on Emergency Resource Homes recruitment and retention. §49-2A-6. Penalties and enforcement. (a) Any failure by the Department of Human Services to adequately reduce the placement of children in hotels shall result in:(1) A review by the Legislative Oversight Committee on Health and Human Resources Accountability; and(2) A requirement to develop and implement a corrective action plan within six months. (b) Any licensed placement agency failing to comply with Emergency Resource Homes or Central Reception Center standards shall face penalties including loss of licensing or funding reductions. §49-2A-7. Effective date. This article shall take effect immediately upon passage, with full implementation required within 12 months. §49-2A-8. Severability. If any provision of this article is found to be unconstitutional or unenforceable, the remaining sections shall remain in full force and effect.